src/fst/affixes/abbreviations.lexc
!! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
!! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
!! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

! LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
! ab-nodot ;
! ab-dot ;
! 
! LEXICON ab-noun
! ab-nodot-noun ;
! ab-dot-noun ;
! 
! LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
! +Abbr: # ;  ! no period, that is.
! 
! LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
! +Abbr: DOT ;
! 
! LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
! +Abbr+N: # ;  ! no period, that is.
! 
! LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +Abbr+N: DOT ;


LEXICON ab-dot-trab
ab-dot-noun-trab ; ! assuming noun

LEXICON ab-dot-trnumab 
ab-dot-noun-trnumab ; ! assuming noun

LEXICON ab-trab
ab-noun-trab ; ! assuming noun 

LEXICON ab-trnumab
ab-noun-trnumab ; ! assuming noun

LEXICON ab-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__
         ab-nodot-noun ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-noun   ;

LEXICON ab-adj-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-adj ;
LEXICON ab-adj-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-adj ;
LEXICON ab-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
         ab-nodot-adj ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-adj   ;

LEXICON ab-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-adv ;
!LEXICON ab-adv-numnoab +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-adv ;
LEXICON ab-adv-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-adv ;
!LEXICON ab-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-adv ;
LEXICON ab-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
         ab-nodot-adv ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-adv   ;

LEXICON ab-num-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-num ;
LEXICON ab-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
         ab-nodot-num ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-num   ;

!! !Lexicons without final period

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  The bulk
 nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;
 nodot-oblique-infl       ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-nodot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__
 nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__
           #     ;
    +Attr: #     ;
           RHyph ;
! +Sg+Nom: #     ;
! +Sg+Acc: #     ;
! +Sg+Gen: #     ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__
 nodot-nomaccgen-infl ;

!! !Lexicons with final period

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-noab    +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adj-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-adj ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-adj-noab    +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-adj ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-adj-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:     ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-numnoab +ABBR+Gram/NumNoAbbr: ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:     ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr:  ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 DOT ; ! Adv without case.

!LEXICON ab-dot-num-itrab +Num+ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-dot-num ;
LEXICON ab-dot-num-trab  +Num+ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-num ;
LEXICON ab-dot-num   !!= * __@CODE@__  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-nomaccgen-infl ;

!LEXICON ab-dot-cc-itrab +CC+ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-dot-cc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-cc-trab  +CC+ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-cc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-cc   !!= * __@CODE@__
 DOT ;


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb-itrab ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-verb ;
LEXICON ab-verb-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-verb ;
LEXICON ab-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__  A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
+Use/NG: ab-dot-verb   ;
         ab-nodot-verb ;


LEXICON ab-dot-verb-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-verb ;
LEXICON ab-dot-verb-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-verb ;
!LEXICON ab-dot-verb-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-verb ;
LEXICON ab-dot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Imp: DOT ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Imp: # ; ! No period.



LEXICON nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl   !!= * __@CODE@__
 nodot-attr-infl      ;
 nodot-nomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON nodot-attr-infl   !!= * __@CODE@__
   +Attr: #     ;

LEXICON nodot-nomaccgen-infl   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: #     ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>%:a #     ; !km:a
 +Sg+Gen: #     ;
          RHyph ;

LEXICON nodot-oblique-infl
          +Sg+Acc:%>%:v     # ;
          +Sg+Ill:%>%:j     # ;
          +Sg+Ela:%>%:s     # ;
          +Sg+Ine:%>%:n     # ;
          +Sg+Com:%>%:jn    # ;
          +Sg+Ess:%>%:n     # ;
          +Pl+Nom:     # ;
          +Pl+Gen:%>%:j    # ;
          +Pl+Acc:%>%:jt    # ;
          +Pl+Ill:%>%:jda   # ;
          +Pl+Ela:%>%:jst    # ;
          +Pl+Ine:%>%:jn    # ;
          +Pl+Com:%>%:j # ;

LEXICON dot-attrnomaccgen-infl   !!= * __@CODE@__
   dot-nomaccgen-infl ;
   dot-attr           ;

LEXICON dot-attr   !!= * __@CODE@__
   +Attr: DOT ;

LEXICON dot-nomaccgen-infl   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Acc: DOT ;
 +Sg+Gen: DOT ;


LEXICON DOT   !!= * __@CODE@__ - Adds the dot to dotted abbreviations.

 +Use/-PMatch:%. # ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts
! Split the abbr + full stop in two segments, but only when using pmatch:
< "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 > # ;
! Make a regular ABBR analysis AND backtrack to find alternative analyses:
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. > # ;
