src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON ITRAB
v.m ab-dot-noun-itrab;
cm ab-nodot-noun-itrab;
tíl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Tórsh ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ritstj ab-dot-noun-itrab;
málfr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
tónl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
skaldsk ab-dot-noun-itrab;
skúl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
postm ab-dot-noun-itrab;
átr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
kvæð ab-dot-noun-itrab;
plfr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
bíbl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
stjm ab-dot-noun-itrab;
herm ab-dot-noun-itrab;
lívfr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
A.L ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Ap ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Fr.% P ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Fr.P ab-dot-noun-itrab;
fo ab-dot-noun-itrab;
I.% N.% D ab-dot-noun-itrab;
IL ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Kr.% F ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Kr.F ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Krf ab-dot-noun-itrab;
Ltd ab-dot-noun-itrab;
a.l ab-dot-noun-itrab;
adj ab-dot-noun-itrab;
alb ab-dot-noun-itrab;
d.% å ab-dot-noun-itrab;
d.y ab-dot-noun-itrab;
dy ab-dot-noun-itrab;
e.% f ab-dot-noun-itrab;
e.% lign ab-dot-noun-itrab;
e.Kr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
e.l ab-dot-noun-itrab;
e.likn ab-dot-noun-itrab;
eftf ab-dot-noun-itrab;
el.likn ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ell.likn ab-dot-noun-itrab;
f.% Kr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
feb ab-dot-noun-itrab;
fr.% p ab-dot-noun-itrab;
gg ab-dot-noun-itrab;
html ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ibid ab-dot-noun-itrab;
jan ab-dot-noun-itrab;
jr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
km ab-dot-noun-itrab;
kr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
kr.% f ab-dot-noun-itrab;
kvm ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ltd ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m% o.h ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.% fl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.% p.% p ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.% v ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.m ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.p.p ab-dot-noun-itrab;
m.v ab-dot-noun-itrab;
md ab-dot-noun-itrab;
mia ab-dot-noun-itrab;
mnd ab-dot-noun-itrab;
moh ab-dot-noun-itrab;
motsv ab-dot-noun-itrab;
muh ab-dot-noun-itrab;
mva ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.% a ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.% h ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.% lign ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.% m ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.% s.% v ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.fl ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.l ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.likn ab-dot-noun-itrab;
o.s.fr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
op.% cit ab-dot-noun-itrab;
osfr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ovfr ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.% g.% a ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.% p ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.% r ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.m ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.p.m ab-dot-noun-itrab;
p.t ab-dot-noun-itrab;
q.% e.% d ab-dot-noun-itrab;
q.e.d ab-dot-noun-itrab;
red ab-dot-noun-itrab;
red.anm ab-dot-noun-itrab;
s.% u ab-dot-noun-itrab;
s.å ab-dot-noun-itrab;
sedv ab-dot-noun-itrab;
sep ab-dot-noun-itrab;
smst ab-dot-noun-itrab;
sst ab-dot-noun-itrab;
ST ab-dot-noun-itrab;
LEXICON TRAB
smb ab-dot-noun-trab ;
matr ab-dot-noun-trab ;
mk ab-dot-noun-trab ;
m.ø ab-dot-adj-trab ;
sbrt ab-dot-adj-trab ;
B ab-trab ;
C ab-trab ;
Co ab-trab ;
E ab-trab ;
G ab-trab ;
J ab-trab ;
L ab-trab ;
NB ab-trab ;
Ot.% prp ab-trab ;
Pfg ab-trab ;
S.% u ab-trab ;
Sp ab-trab ;
Su ab-trab ;
V ab-trab ;
Z ab-trab ;
am ab-trab ;
arab ab-trab ;
austr ab-trab ;
balt ab-trab ;
biol ab-trab ;
brig ab-trab ;
cand.mag ab-trab ;
cand.theol ab-trab ;
cm3 ab-trab ;
frumnorr ab-dot-trab ;
real ab-trab ;
co ab-trab ;
d.% m ab-trab ;
d.e ab-trab ;
d.å ab-trab ;
dim ab-trab ;
dr ab-trab ;
dr.theol ab-trab ;
dvs ab-trab ;
eksp.sj ab-trab ;
ev ab-trab ;
f.% m ab-trab ;
f.eks ab-trab ;
f.t ab-trab ;
fec ab-trab ;
fig ab-trab ;
fol ab-trab ;
fr ab-trab ;
gen ab-trab ;
genr.lt ab-trab ;
gno ab-trab ;
gt ab-trab ;
hr ab-trab ;
imp ab-trab ;
iness ab-trab ;
int ab-trab ;
istf ab-trab ;
k.s ab-trab ;
kgl.% res ab-trab ;
kl ab-trab ;
konj ab-trab ;
kurd ab-trab ;
lim ab-trab ;
m ab-trab ;
m2 ab-trab ;
m.a.o ab-trab ;
maks ab-trab ;
mht ab-trab ;
ms ab-trab ;
nbr ab-trab ;
obj ab-trab ;
odont ab-trab ;
omkr ab-trab ;
p ab-trab ;
pfg ab-trab ;
docx ab-trab ;
pkt ab-trab ;
pr ab-trab ;
prof ab-trab ;
psyk ab-trab ;
resp ab-trab ;
s.a ab-trab ;
sbr ab-trab ;
sgt ab-trab ;
sm ab-trab ;
st ab-trab ;
st.polit ab-trab ;
st.theol ab-trab ;
sv ab-trab ;
t.% o.% m ab-trab ;
t.h ab-trab ;
th ab-trab ;
tir ab-trab ;
tyrk ab-trab ;
u.dir ab-trab ;
ubest ab-trab ;
us ab-trab ;
v ab-trab ;
v.s.a ab-trab ;
Æ ab-trab ;
ÍF ab-trab ;
SMS ab-trab ;
VB ab-trab ;
VÍF ab-trab ;
MPEG-4 ab-trab ;
útg ab-dot-trab ;
viðv ab-dot-trab ;
sept ab-dot-trab ;
tilt ab-dot-trab ;
lækn ab-dot-trab ;
orðt ab-dot-trab ;
Suð ab-dot-trab ;
Tórsh ab-dot-trab ;
ítr ab-dot-trab ;
bát ab-dot-trab ;
søg ab-dot-trab ;
búsk ab-dot-trab ;
sjóm ab-dot-trab ;
fugl ab-dot-trab ;
fisk ab-dot-trab ;
skip ab-dot-trab ;
alisfr ab-dot-trab ;
stn ab-dot-trab ;
jarðfr ab-dot-trab ;
skemt ab-dot-trab ;
seyðal ab-dot-trab ;
evnafr ab-dot-trab ;
niðr ab-dot-trab ;
tlm ab-dot-trab ;
kortsp ab-dot-trab ;
óregl ab-dot-trab ;
teld ab-dot-trab ;
húsasm ab-dot-trab ;
bjarg ab-dot-trab ;
fólktr ab-dot-trab ;
bún ab-dot-trab ;
stjfr ab-dot-trab ;
barn ab-dot-trab ;
handv ab-dot-trab ;
ravm ab-dot-trab ;
handarb ab-dot-trab ;
veðurfr ab-dot-trab ;
ným ab-dot-trab ;
Sa ab-dot-trab ;
trygg ab-dot-trab ;
landafr ab-dot-trab ;
prent ab-dot-trab ;
óvand ab-dot-trab ;
upprfr ab-dot-trab ;
samt ab-dot-trab ;
sálfr ab-dot-trab ;
speis ab-dot-trab ;
fróðsk ab-dot-trab ;
Nóls ab-dot-trab ;
tannl ab-dot-trab ;
mjólk ab-dot-trab ;
gudal ab-dot-trab ;
Sumb ab-dot-trab ;
byggil ab-dot-trab ;
útv ab-dot-trab ;
flogm ab-dot-trab ;
illb ab-dot-trab ;
blíðm ab-dot-trab ;
heimsp ab-dot-trab ;
No ab-dot-trab ;
Myk ab-dot-trab ;
fríðk ab-dot-trab ;
Hvlb ab-dot-trab ;
Gj ab-dot-trab ;
ídn ab-dot-trab ;
siglfr ab-dot-trab ;
góðn ab-dot-trab ;
eið ab-dot-trab ;
bókb ab-dot-trab ;
Fám ab-dot-trab ;
skr ab-dot-trab ;
sjv ab-dot-trab ;
fornfr ab-dot-trab ;
Svk ab-dot-trab ;
Mikld ab-dot-trab ;
Dal ab-dot-trab ;
Skú ab-dot-trab ;
ópers ab-dot-trab ;
uppr ab-dot-trab ;
Vág ab-dot-trab ;
Sørv ab-dot-trab ;
Vestm ab-dot-trab ;
Suð ab-dot-trab ;
Sand ab-dot-trab ;
Leirv ab-dot-trab ;
Gásad ab-dot-trab ;
Fugl ab-dot-trab ;
vanl ab-dot-trab ;
serst ab-dot-trab ;
orðt ab-dot-trab ;
exam.art ab-dot-trab ;
cand.phil ab-dot-trab ;
Viðr ab-dot-trab ;
Svín ab-dot-trab ;
Sandav ab-dot-trab ;
Hatt ab-dot-trab ;
Dím ab-dot-trab ;
